be_BY/be-official.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2246 Y 1
SFX 2246 0 ніцтва .
SFX 2244 Y 1
SFX 2244 0 ніцтве .
SFX 2712 Y 1
SFX 2712 0 ерных .
SFX 2711 Y 1
SFX 2711 0 ерныя .
SFX 3807 Y 1
SFX 3807 0 яем .
SFX 1910 Y 1
SFX 1910 0 ыяю .
SFX 1044 Y 1
SFX 1044 0 чцы .
SFX 1135 Y 1
SFX 1135 0 каць .
SFX 2611 Y 1
SFX 2611 0 ыну .
SFX 2610 Y 1
SFX 2610 0 ыны .
SFX 810 Y 1
SFX 810 0 ватых .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 ватыя .
SFX 3820 Y 1
SFX 3820 0 ынамі .
SFX 4270 Y 1
SFX 4270 0 унам .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 ніку .
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 0 нікі .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 0 наваму .
SFX 2081 Y 1
SFX 2081 0 талі .
SFX 2393 Y 1
SFX 2393 0 ляйся .
SFX 2072 Y 1
SFX 2072 0 чваць .
SFX 3240 Y 1
SFX 3240 0 ыхах .
SFX 2989 Y 1
SFX 2989 0 ыхаю .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 ла .
SFX 819 Y 1
SFX 819 0 ле .
SFX 1437 Y 1
SFX 1437 0 ло .
SFX 3351 Y 1
SFX 3351 0 атарах .
SFX 3481 Y 1
SFX 3481 0 атараў .
SFX 2030 Y 1
SFX 2030 0 рае .
SFX 1102 Y 1
SFX 1102 0 рай .
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 0 рак .
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 рам .
SFX 1271 Y 1
SFX 1271 0 аўскую .
SFX 1631 Y 1
SFX 1631 0 зілася .
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 0 ннаму .
SFX 3852 Y 1
SFX 3852 0 ствуючы .
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 0 шага .
SFX 3992 Y 1
SFX 3992 0 нела .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 кую .
SFX 3041 Y 1
SFX 3041 0 істасць .
SFX 3040 Y 1
SFX 3040 0 істасцю .
SFX 3042 Y 1
SFX 3042 0 істасці .
SFX 2240 Y 1
SFX 2240 0 ннях .
SFX 2222 Y 1
SFX 2222 0 нняў .
SFX 1529 Y 1
SFX 1529 0 ніцкі .
SFX 1537 Y 1
SFX 1537 0 дзіце .
SFX 2679 Y 1
SFX 2679 0 овачнымі .
SFX 4067 Y 1
SFX 4067 0 неюць .
SFX 4700 Y 1
SFX 4700 0 ьшчыцах .
SFX 4699 Y 1
SFX 4699 0 ьшчыцаю .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 0 навую .
SFX 3292 Y 1
SFX 3292 0 таванага .
SFX 2133 Y 1
SFX 2133 0 ткай .
SFX 1569 Y 1
SFX 1569 0 ткам .
SFX 2302 Y 1
SFX 2302 0 жваем .
SFX 1814 Y 1
SFX 1814 0 раванаму .
SFX 3244 Y 1
SFX 3244 0 чынаю .
SFX 4226 Y 1
SFX 4226 0 асам .
SFX 4769 Y 1
SFX 4769 0 носны .
SFX 1853 Y 1
SFX 1853 0 арнаю .
SFX 1852 Y 1
SFX 1852 0 арная .
SFX 4906 Y 1
SFX 4906 0 чаючы .
SFX 3999 Y 1
SFX 3999 0 льніцах .
SFX 3998 Y 1
SFX 3998 0 льніцаю .
SFX 4565 Y 1
SFX 4565 0 сваюць .
SFX 3917 Y 1
SFX 3917 0 графічным .
SFX 3871 Y 1
SFX 3871 0 роўка .
SFX 4839 Y 1
SFX 4839 0 годдзе .
SFX 1382 Y 1
SFX 1382 0 зіцца .
SFX 1109 Y 1
SFX 1109 0 еных .
SFX 1108 Y 1
SFX 1108 0 еныя .
SFX 364 Y 1
SFX 364 0 уюць .
SFX 2188 Y 1
SFX 2188 0 авікамі .
SFX 1719 Y 1
SFX 1719 0 тны .
SFX 2721 Y 1
SFX 2721 0 ернае .
SFX 2720 Y 1
SFX 2720 0 ернай .
SFX 4108 Y 1
SFX 4108 0 аўцу .
SFX 1953 Y 1
SFX 1953 0 аўцы .
SFX 984 Y 1
SFX 984 0 ляла .
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 0 чыся .
SFX 4604 Y 1
SFX 4604 0 нічнымі .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 нутую .
SFX 3802 Y 1
SFX 3802 0 аджу .
SFX 3836 Y 1
SFX 3836 0 цтву .
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 0 рнаю .
SFX 1079 Y 1
SFX 1079 0 рная .
SFX 1459 Y 1
SFX 1459 0 чаным .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 0 ыце .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 ешся .
SFX 818 Y 1
SFX 818 0 аючыся .
SFX 3843 Y 1
SFX 3843 0 ўшчыкамі .
SFX 3922 Y 1
SFX 3922 0 графічнаму .
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 0 ваўшы .
SFX 1609 Y 1
SFX 1609 0 аваты .
SFX 2162 Y 1
SFX 2162 0 аннях .
SFX 2122 Y 1
SFX 2122 0 анняў .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 ватае .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 0 ватай .
SFX 4100 Y 1
SFX 4100 0 гаем .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 нуўшыся .
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 каму .
SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73 0 камі .
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 0 навага .
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 0 ніц .
SFX 3740 Y 1
SFX 3740 0 ніш .
SFX 4779 Y 1
SFX 4779 0 нія .
SFX 3742 Y 1
SFX 3742 0 ніў .
SFX 3011 Y 1
SFX 3011 0 чнікам .
SFX 1166 Y 1
SFX 1166 0 ападобны .
SFX 4321 Y 1
SFX 4321 0 евы .
SFX 4350 Y 1
SFX 4350 0 ачоў .
SFX 4761 Y 1
SFX 4761 0 ометрах .
SFX 4762 Y 1
SFX 4762 0 ометраў .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 тасць .
SFX 2318 Y 1
SFX 2318 0 тасцю .
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 0 тасці .
SFX 4150 Y 1
SFX 4150 0 хаўшы .
SFX 894 Y 1
SFX 894 0 падобнаму .
SFX 3000 Y 1
SFX 3000 0 шчыцкі .
SFX 2513 Y 1
SFX 2513 0 ьскаму .
SFX 3137 Y 1
SFX 3137 0 гадоваю .
SFX 3136 Y 1
SFX 3136 0 гадовая .
SFX 2206 Y 1
SFX 2206 0 сцкаму .
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 0 ннага .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 0 ваты .
SFX 1038 Y 1
SFX 1038 0 ху .
SFX 2273 Y 1
SFX 2273 0 халі .
SFX 1120 Y 1
SFX 1120 0 хі .
SFX 2424 Y 1
SFX 2424 0 шку .
SFX 2238 Y 1
SFX 2238 0 шкі .
SFX 903 Y 1
SFX 903 0 альным .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 нуць .
SFX 2538 Y 1
SFX 2538 0 гу .
SFX 2728 Y 1
SFX 2728 0 гі .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 тымі .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 авым .
SFX 3210 Y 1
SFX 3210 0 жаю .
SFX 3211 Y 1
SFX 3211 0 жаў .
SFX 3877 Y 1
SFX 3877 0 піце .
SFX 4194 Y 1
SFX 4194 0 кваю .
SFX 4196 Y 1
SFX 4196 0 кваў .
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 0 навых .
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 0 навыя .
SFX 2890 Y 1
SFX 2890 0 ачыся .
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 0 шыце .
SFX 1817 Y 1
SFX 1817 0 раванага .
SFX 1824 Y 1
SFX 1824 0 ьваць .
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 0 аешся .
SFX 3899 Y 1
SFX 3899 0 іраваўшы .
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 0 аваным .
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 0 інах .
SFX 1514 Y 1
SFX 1514 0 інаю .
SFX 4763 Y 1
SFX 4763 0 ометрамі .
SFX 4613 Y 1
SFX 4613 0 метрамі .
SFX 2467 Y 1
SFX 2467 0 акамі .
SFX 4968 Y 1
SFX 4968 0 ногіх .
SFX 4967 Y 1
SFX 4967 0 ногія .
SFX 3076 Y 1
SFX 3076 0 ызацыяю .
SFX 1117 Y 1
SFX 1117 0 енае .
SFX 1116 Y 1
SFX 1116 0 енай .
SFX 1697 Y 1
SFX 1697 0 ковымі .
SFX 4097 Y 1
SFX 4097 0 далі .
SFX 3919 Y 1
SFX 3919 0 графічную .
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 0 ўку .
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 0 ўкі .
SFX 2492 Y 1
SFX 2492 0 зала .
SFX 4293 Y 1
SFX 4293 0 мерах .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 мераў .
SFX 2503 Y 1
SFX 2503 0 эннем .
SFX 1810 Y 1
SFX 1810 0 раваны .
SFX 1494 Y 1
SFX 1494 0 ліваючы .
SFX 2599 Y 1
SFX 2599 0 ацеся .
SFX 2211 Y 1
SFX 2211 0 нутых .
SFX 2210 Y 1
SFX 2210 0 нутыя .
SFX 3659 Y 1
SFX 3659 0 алу .
SFX 3145 Y 1
SFX 3145 0 алы .
SFX 4848 Y 1
SFX 4848 0 аль .
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 0 алі .
SFX 2982 Y 1
SFX 2982 0 амся .
SFX 3925 Y 1
SFX 3925 0 графічнага .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 0 ануць .
SFX 4275 Y 1
SFX 4275 0 руся .
SFX 4101 Y 1
SFX 4101 0 водству .
SFX 4296 Y 1
SFX 4296 0 мер .
SFX 2243 Y 1
SFX 2243 0 ніцтву .
SFX 2412 Y 1
SFX 2412 0 атымі .
SFX 1959 Y 1
SFX 1959 0 ьваўся .
SFX 362 Y 1
SFX 362 0 кага .
SFX 948 Y 1
SFX 948 0 ячы .
SFX 1823 Y 1
SFX 1823 0 ьваюць .
SFX 1461 Y 1
SFX 1461 0 чаную .
SFX 4058 Y 1
SFX 4058 0 раемся .
SFX 2953 Y 1
SFX 2953 0 каюцца .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 0 нікамі .
SFX 4976 Y 1
SFX 4976 0 навала .
SFX 3648 Y 1
SFX 3648 0 дзілася .
SFX 3805 Y 1
SFX 3805 0 яеш .
SFX 1600 Y 1
SFX 1600 0 ліваюцца .
SFX 4290 Y 1
SFX 4290 0 наць .
SFX 2608 Y 1
SFX 2608 0 ьваннем .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 айце .
SFX 4268 Y 1
SFX 4268 0 унах .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 0 анне .
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 0 падобнага .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 цеся .
SFX 2472 Y 1
SFX 2472 0 чвацца .
SFX 4221 Y 1
SFX 4221 0 віна .
SFX 4220 Y 1
SFX 4220 0 віне .
SFX 2516 Y 1
SFX 2516 0 ьскага .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 а .
SFX 3060 Y 1
SFX 3060 0 б .
SFX 2975 Y 1
SFX 2975 0 г .
SFX 1632 Y 1
SFX 1632 0 д .
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 е .
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 0 ж .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 0 з .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 й .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 к .
SFX 1266 Y 1
SFX 1266 0 л .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 м .
SFX 373 Y 1
SFX 373 0 н .
SFX 3613 Y 1
SFX 3613 0 п .
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 0 сцкага .
SFX 1324 Y 1
SFX 1324 0 аўскае .
SFX 1323 Y 1
SFX 1323 0 аўскай .
SFX 3528 Y 1
SFX 3528 0 оўвала .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 калася .
SFX 1636 Y 1
SFX 1636 0 вальным .
SFX 1516 Y 1
SFX 1516 0 ніцеся .
SFX 1604 Y 1
SFX 1604 0 лівалася .
SFX 2663 Y 1
SFX 2663 0 тычнымі .
SFX 4871 Y 1
SFX 4871 0 эў .
SFX 4439 Y 1
SFX 4439 0 оўшчыцай .
SFX 4438 Y 1
SFX 4438 0 оўшчыцам .
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 0 лу .
SFX 379 Y 1
SFX 379 0 лы .
SFX 1144 Y 1
SFX 1144 0 ль .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 лю .
SFX 1239 Y 1
SFX 1239 0 ля .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 лі .
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 0 рах .
SFX 1055 Y 1
SFX 1055 0 раю .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 раў .
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 0 кае .
SFX 4973 Y 1
SFX 4973 0 ніўшы .
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 кай .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 кам .
SFX 4823 Y 1
SFX 4823 0 заўшы .
SFX 4859 Y 1
SFX 4859 0 аграфічнаму .
SFX 3394 Y 1
SFX 3394 0 тавана .
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 0 чыўшы .
SFX 592 Y 1
SFX 592 0 ьным .
SFX 915 Y 1
SFX 915 0 альную .
SFX 3671 Y 1
SFX 3671 0 чыўшыся .
SFX 2361 Y 1
SFX 2361 0 іравала .
SFX 3991 Y 1
SFX 3991 0 нелі .
SFX 4210 Y 1
SFX 4210 0 еюць .
SFX 3969 Y 1
SFX 3969 0 таюць .
SFX 1268 Y 1
SFX 1268 0 каеце .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 авую .
SFX 3388 Y 1
SFX 3388 0 часць .
SFX 3387 Y 1
SFX 3387 0 часцю .
SFX 3389 Y 1
SFX 3389 0 часці .
SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 0 навае .
SFX 2695 Y 1
SFX 2695 0 навай .
SFX 4057 Y 1
SFX 4057 0 раецеся .
SFX 1699 Y 1
SFX 1699 0 ковы .
SFX 1607 Y 1
SFX 1607 0 дзіць .
SFX 4232 Y 1
SFX 4232 0 антамі .
SFX 1572 Y 1
SFX 1572 0 снымі .
SFX 1567 Y 1
SFX 1567 0 тках .
SFX 2132 Y 1
SFX 2132 0 ткаю .
SFX 2300 Y 1
SFX 2300 0 жваеш .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 чаем .
SFX 4223 Y 1
SFX 4223 0 асты .
SFX 622 Y 1
SFX 622 0 аваную .
SFX 4689 Y 1
SFX 4689 0 будаванне .
SFX 2481 Y 1
SFX 2481 0 уешся .
SFX 4752 Y 1
SFX 4752 0 оўваўся .
SFX 2553 Y 1
SFX 2553 0 шанаму .
SFX 3915 Y 1
SFX 3915 0 графічных .
SFX 3914 Y 1
SFX 3914 0 графічныя .
SFX 3523 Y 1
SFX 3523 0 оўваюць .
SFX 3867 Y 1
SFX 3867 0 роўку .
SFX 3868 Y 1
SFX 3868 0 роўкі .
SFX 4836 Y 1
SFX 4836 0 годдзю .
SFX 4835 Y 1
SFX 4835 0 годдзя .
SFX 4837 Y 1
SFX 4837 0 годдзі .
SFX 3552 Y 1
SFX 3552 0 іту .
SFX 4979 Y 1
SFX 4979 0 льскую .
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 ваючыся .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 анаму .
SFX 2541 Y 1
SFX 2541 0 анамі .
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 0 нуўшы .
SFX 4263 Y 1
SFX 4263 0 цеў .
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 0 ава .
SFX 4840 Y 1
SFX 4840 0 вальніку .
SFX 4841 Y 1
SFX 4841 0 вальнікі .
SFX 2220 Y 1
SFX 2220 0 нутае .
SFX 2219 Y 1
SFX 2219 0 нутай .
SFX 4922 Y 1
SFX 4922 0 ціна .
SFX 4148 Y 1
SFX 4148 0 ціне .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 0 ернаю .
SFX 2717 Y 1
SFX 2717 0 ерная .
SFX 4755 Y 1
SFX 4755 0 оўваецца .
SFX 4838 Y 1
SFX 4838 0 годдзем .
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 0 лялі .
SFX 2359 Y 1
SFX 2359 0 іраваў .
SFX 1132 Y 1
SFX 1132 0 кала .
SFX 3560 Y 1
SFX 3560 0 жацца .
SFX 3715 Y 1
SFX 3715 0 ўцамі .
SFX 1457 Y 1
SFX 1457 0 чаных .
SFX 1456 Y 1
SFX 1456 0 чаныя .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 0 ыцы .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 ыць .
SFX 4361 Y 1
SFX 4361 0 яны .
SFX 4084 Y 1
SFX 4084 0 йка .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 0 ватаю .
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 0 ватая .
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 0 зячы .
SFX 2438 Y 1
SFX 2438 0 -небудзь .
SFX 4216 Y 1
SFX 4216 0 гаеш .
SFX 2751 Y 1
SFX 2751 0 уйся .
SFX 4478 Y 1
SFX 4478 0 жаем .
SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 0 наму .
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 0 намі .
SFX 4071 Y 1
SFX 4071 0 нгу .
SFX 2561 Y 1
SFX 2561 0 тавы .
SFX 537 Y 1
SFX 537 0 льнымі .
SFX 3501 Y 1
SFX 3501 0 чніках .
SFX 3502 Y 1
SFX 3502 0 чнікаў .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 0 рскімі .
SFX 2075 Y 1
SFX 2075 0 чвала .
SFX 3606 Y 1
SFX 3606 н стым н
SFX 1186 Y 1
SFX 1186 е ілася е
SFX 2253 Y 1
SFX 2253 е істую е
SFX 2249 Y 1
SFX 2249 е істыя е
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 у яце у
SFX 2255 Y 1
SFX 2255 е істаю е
SFX 4520 Y 1
SFX 4520 ў шае ў
SFX 4250 Y 1
SFX 4250 ў шай ў
SFX 2580 Y 1
SFX 2580 і нулі і
SFX 346 Y 1
SFX 346 т цкімі т
SFX 4886 Y 1
SFX 4886 ў чыцца ў
SFX 3942 Y 1
SFX 3942 х шак х
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 ы яце ы
SFX 2011 Y 1
SFX 2011 ў чана ў
SFX 565 Y 1
SFX 565 е лых е
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 ю яце ю
SFX 2178 Y 1
SFX 2178 і ну і
SFX 1919 Y 1
SFX 1919 ц чаем ц
SFX 1722 Y 1
SFX 1722 і ня і
SFX 1260 Y 1
SFX 1260 і ны і
SFX 2645 Y 1
SFX 2645 і ьніцкі і
SFX 1122 Y 1
SFX 1122 й лых й
SFX 1738 Y 1
SFX 1738 т цыі т
SFX 1737 Y 1
SFX 1737 т цыю т
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 ў цім ў
SFX 4529 Y 1
SFX 4529 х цыі х
SFX 4528 Y 1
SFX 4528 х цыю х
SFX 4373 Y 1
SFX 4373 х шы х
SFX 1879 Y 1
SFX 1879 і яце і
SFX 1788 Y 1
SFX 1788 ы эць ы
SFX 4867 Y 1
SFX 4867 ы янымі ы
SFX 3673 Y 1
SFX 3673 ў чваю ў
SFX 1358 Y 1
SFX 1358 а іцах а
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 і ьнымі і
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 м це м
SFX 4462 Y 1
SFX 4462 й ло й
SFX 1932 Y 1
SFX 1932 ю янымі ю
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 м уючы м
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 і ьным і
SFX 690 Y 1
SFX 690 й льніках й
SFX 3253 Y 1
SFX 3253 й чным й
SFX 3024 Y 1
SFX 3024 й льшчыцу й
SFX 3023 Y 1
SFX 3023 й льшчыцы й
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 к чным к
SFX 1149 Y 1
SFX 1149 і яму і
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 й му й
SFX 3252 Y 1
SFX 3252 м чным м
SFX 740 Y 1
SFX 740 к му к
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 ь ям ь
SFX 964 Y 1
SFX 964 а нымі а
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 е нням е
SFX 703 Y 1
SFX 703 ю ям ю
